Utah statutes.
17-53-104.   Vacancy in a county office -- Vacancies in the office of county
attorney or district attorney.
(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), a vacancy in a county office shall
be filled as provided in Section 20A-1-508.
(2) A vacancy in the office of county attorney or district attorney shall be
filled as provided in Sections 20A-1-509.1, 20A-1-509.2, and 20A-1-509.3.
